Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4562.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of health and human services for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 State general fund/general purpose $ 100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $100.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594.